Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-2702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Veteran and Active Duty Supportive Postsecondary Institution Act:

(1) Department means the Department of Veterans' Affairs;

(2) Director means the Director of Veterans' Affairs;

(3) Military student means a student who serves on active duty in the armed forces of the United States other than active duty for training;

(4) Postsecondary institution has the same meaning as in section 85-2403; and

(5) Veteran student means a student who served on active duty in the armed forces of the United States other than active duty for training.

Laws 2019, LB486, § 2.